Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-512.01
Service on
partnership.

A partnership or limited partnership
may be served by personal, residence, certified
mail, or designated delivery service
upon any partner except a limited partner, or by certified mail or designated delivery service
at its usual place of business, or the process may be left at its usual place
of business with an employee of the partnership or limited partnership.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 29;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 14.

Registration and agent for service of process of foreign limited partnerships, see section 67-281.